Utah statutes.
48-2c-1402.   Articles of conversion.

The articles of conversion shall state:

(1)  the date on which and jurisdiction where the subject entity was first created, formed, incorporated, or otherwise came into being and, if it has changed, its jurisdiction immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic company;

(2)  the name of the subject entity immediately prior to the filing of the articles of conversion;

(3)  the name of the company as set forth in its articles of organization filed in accordance with Subsection 48-2c-1401(2)(b);

(4)  the future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain, of the conversion to a domestic company if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the articles of conversion and the articles of organization; and

(5)  that the conversion has been duly approved by the owners of the subject entity.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

